Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.052

Indictment or information—Requisites.

The indictment or information must contain—

(1) The title of the action, specifying the name of the court to which the indictment or information is presented and the names of the parties;

(2) A statement of the acts constituting the offense, in ordinary and concise language, without repetition, and in such manner as to enable a person of common understanding to know what is intended.

[ 1891 c 28 s 20; Code 1881 s 1004; 1873 p 224 s 187; 1869 p 240 s 182; RRS s 2055. Formerly RCW 10.37.050, part.]